Washington statutes.
RCW 39.98.070

Appropriation required.

In order to effect the provisions of Article VIII, section 1(e) of the state Constitution, Senate Joint Resolution No. 8206, the legislature shall make provision for such amounts as may be required to make timely payments under the state school district credit enhancement program under this chapter in each and every biennial appropriations act.

[ 1999 c 273 s 7.]